District of Columbia statutes.
21-1712

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Uniform Fiduciaries Act”.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 778, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
June 16, 1989, D.C. Law 8-9, § 2(c), 36 DCR 3361
1981 Ed., § 21-1712.
1973 Ed., § 21-1712.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 14 of the Uniform Fiduciaries Act.